Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1264.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 15, chapter 19, article 1, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding sections 15-2407 and 15-2408, to read: START_STATUTE15-2407. Joint legislative audit committee; committees of reference; program review; reports; auditor general; audit; continuation; definitions A. The joint legislative audit committee shall direct the appropriate legislative committees of reference established pursuant to section 41-2954 to which the department is assigned to complete a program review of the Arizona empowerment scholarship accounts program at least seventeen months before the termination date for the program prescribed by section 15-2408. B. The committees of reference shall undertake the program review in the scope and detail the committees of reference deem appropriate and shall address whether there is a need for the program in this state.  If the committees of reference determine there is a need for the program, the committees of REFERENCE shall assess the degree to which the original objectives of the program have been achieved, expressed in terms of the performance, impact or accomplishments of the program and of the situation the program was intended to address. C. The committees of reference shall complete the draft program review report not later than eleven months before the termination date for the program prescribed by section 15-2408. Before the draft program review report is submitted, the department shall be given an OPPORTUNITY to review, within forty calendar days, the draft program review report and submit written comments or a rebuttal to be included in the preliminary program review report. D. The committees of reference shall submit the preliminary program review report to the governor, to each member of the joint legislative audit committee, to each member of the committees of reference to which the department is assigned and to the department on or before October 1 of the year before the scheduled termination date for the program prescribed by section 15-2408. E. The joint legislative audit committee shall direct the auditor general to conduct a program performance audit to determine any of the following: 1. Whether the department is managing the program in an economical and efficient manner. 2. Causes of inefficiencies or uneconomical practices in the program, including inadequacies in management information systems, internal and administrative procedures, organizational structure, use of resources, allocation of personnel, purchasing policies and equipment. 3. Whether the desired results of the program are being achieved. 4. Whether the objectives of the program as established by the legislature are being met. F. The auditor general shall conduct the program performance audit in a manner that is consistent with the performance audit procedures prescribed in title 41, chapter 7, article 10.1 and shall submit the audit results to the governor, to each member of the joint legislative audit committee, to each member of the committees of reference to which the department is assigned and to the department on or before October 1 of the year before the scheduled termination date for the program prescribed by section 15-2408. G. After receipt of the program performance audit, the committees of reference shall hold at least one public hearing to receive testimony from the public and from the officials of the department. The committees of reference may hold additional public hearings for the purposes provided in section 41-2954, subsection C as applicable to the program. H. In determining whether to continue or terminate the program, each committee of reference shall consider the information provided in the preliminary program review report and the program performance audit and the factors provided in section 41-2954, subsection D as applicable to the program. i. The program is continued pursuant to this section if legislation to continue the program is passed by the legislature and signed by the governor before the termination date for the program pursuant to section 15-2408, even if the legislation to continue the program has not become effective on the date of scheduled termination. j. If the legislature continues the program, the joint legislative audit committee may direct the auditor general or the committees of reference to conduct a follow-up review of the program to determine how the department has performed its statutory functions or corrected deficiencies relating to the program before program review, or both. K. For the purposes of this section: 1. "committee of reference" hAS THE SAME MEANING PRESCRIBED IN SECTION 41-2952. 2. "Program" means the Arizona empowerment scholarship accounts program. 3. "Program review" means a systematic evaluation by the committees of reference under the supervision of the joint legislative audit committee, with the assistance of the department, the joint legislative budget committee, the auditor general and support staff, to determine whether the merits of the program justify its continuation rather than termination or its continuation at a level less than or greater than the existing level. END_STATUTE START_STATUTE15-2408. Arizona empowerment scholarship accounts program; termination July 1, 2034; delayed repeal A. The Arizona empowerment scholarship accounts program terminates on July 1, 2034. B. This chapter and this section are repealed from and after December 31, 2034. END_STATUTE